New York, session 2025-2026, A1211.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 501-i 2 to read as follows: 3 § 501-i. The center for fatherhood initiatives. There is hereby 4 established within the office of children and family services the center 5 for fatherhood initiatives. The center for fatherhood initiatives shall 6 issue grants to initiatives regarding the promotion and advancement of 7 fatherhood, including but not limited to all underserved fatherhood 8 groups to help expand opportunities to improve parenting knowledge, 9 attitudes, and self-efficacy. The center for fatherhood initiatives may 10 also provide such services. The commissioner of the office of children 11 and family services may promulgate any necessary rules and regulations 12 for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of the center for 13 fatherhood initiatives. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 15 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00316-05-6